Idaho, session 2025, H0350.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 10, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-1035, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-1035. BINDING ALLOCATIONS. Any funds distributed by the state to
school districts or public charter schools that are specifically identified
in statute or in an appropriation bill as intended for a certain purpose
shall be used only for such purpose. Any funds intended for a certain pur-
pose but used for another purpose shall be reimbursed to the state by the
school district or public charter school and deposited to the state general
fund. If the school district or public charter school fails to make such
reimbursement, an amount equivalent to the misused funds shall be deducted
from the state's next payment to the school district or public charter school
pursuant to this chapter or chapter 52, title 33, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.